Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-941
University of Nebraska; certain graduate programs; baccalaureate professional programs; agriculture and natural resources programs; responsibilities.

The University of Nebraska shall have sole responsibility for all graduate programs at the specialist and master's degree level and all baccalaureate professional programs throughout the public sector of postsecondary education in Nebraska, with the exception of programs in education and other areas authorized by the Legislature at the state colleges. The University of Nebraska shall have primary responsibility for instruction in agriculture and natural resources and primary statewide responsibility for research and public service in agriculture and natural resources. All baccalaureate and baccalaureate transfer programs in agriculture and natural resources initiated after July 1, 1978, at state colleges and community colleges shall be conducted in cooperation with the University of Nebraska.

Laws 1978, LB 756, § 25;

Laws 1984, LB 970, § 1;

Laws 1991, LB 6, § 3.